Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.090

Ten jurors may render verdict.

When ten of the jurors agree upon a verdict, the verdict so agreed upon shall be signed by the jury foreperson, and the verdict so agreed upon shall be and stand as the verdict of the jury.

[ 2013 c 23 s 3; 1909 p 374 s 9; 1903 c 111 s 9; RRS s 914.]

NOTES:

Verdict, civil actions, ten jurors may render: RCW 4.44.380.